Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.510

Death benefits.

(1) Except as provided in RCW 11.07.010, if a member or a vested member who has not completed at least ten years of service dies, the amount of the accumulated contributions standing to such member's credit in the retirement system at the time of such member's death, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust, or organization as the member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the department. If there be no such designated person or persons still living at the time of the member's death, such member's accumulated contributions standing to such member's credit in the retirement system, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse or domestic partner as if in fact such spouse or domestic partner had been nominated by written designation, or if there be no such surviving spouse or domestic partner, then to such member's legal representatives.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, if a member who is killed in the course of employment or a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has completed at least ten years of service dies, the surviving spouse, domestic partner, or eligible child or children shall elect to receive either:

(a) A retirement allowance computed as provided for in RCW 41.26.430, actuarially reduced by the amount of any lump sum benefit identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670 and actuarially adjusted to reflect a joint and one hundred percent survivor option under RCW 41.26.460 and if the member was not eligible for normal retirement at the date of death a further reduction as described in RCW 41.26.430; if a surviving spouse or domestic partner who is receiving a retirement allowance dies leaving a child or children of the member under the age of majority, then such child or children shall continue to receive an allowance in an amount equal to that which was being received by the surviving spouse or domestic partner, share and share alike, until such child or children reach the age of majority; if there is no surviving spouse or domestic partner eligible to receive an allowance at the time of the member's death, such member's child or children under the age of majority shall receive an allowance share and share alike calculated as herein provided making the assumption that the ages of the spouse or domestic partner and member were equal at the time of the member's death; or

(b)(i) The member's accumulated contributions, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670; or

(ii) If the member dies on or after July 25, 1993, one hundred fifty percent of the member's accumulated contributions, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670. Any accumulated contributions attributable to restorations made under RCW 41.50.165(2) shall be refunded at one hundred percent.

(3) If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has completed at least ten years of service dies after October 1, 1977, and is not survived by a spouse, domestic partner, or an eligible child, then the accumulated contributions standing to the member's credit, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid:

(a) To an estate, a person or persons, trust, or organization as the member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the department; or

(b) If there is no such designated person or persons still living at the time of the member's death, then to the member's legal representatives.

(4) The retirement allowance of a member:

(a) Who is killed in the course of employment, as determined by the director of the department of labor and industries,

(b) Who has left the employ of an employer due to service in the national guard or military reserves and dies while honorably serving in the national guard or military reserves during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005, or

(c) Who has left the employ of an employer due to service in the national guard, military reserves, federal emergency management agency, or national disaster medical system of the United States department of health and human services and dies while performing service in response to a disaster, major emergency, special event, federal exercise, or official training on or after March 22, 2014,

is not subject to an actuarial reduction for early retirement as provided in RCW 41.26.430 or an actuarial reduction to reflect a joint and one hundred percent survivor option under RCW 41.26.460. The member's retirement allowance is computed under RCW 41.26.420, except that the member shall be entitled to a minimum retirement allowance equal to ten percent of such member's final average salary. The member shall additionally receive a retirement allowance equal to two percent of such member's average final salary for each year of service beyond five.

(5) The retirement allowance paid to the spouse or domestic partner and dependent children of a member who is killed in the course of employment, as set forth in RCW 41.05.011(5), shall include reimbursement for any payments of premium rates to the Washington state health care authority pursuant to RCW 41.05.080.

(6) In addition to the benefits provided in subsection (4) of this section, if the surviving spouse or domestic partner of a member who is killed in the course of employment is not eligible to receive industrial insurance payments pursuant to RCW 51.32.050 due to remarriage, the surviving spouse or domestic partner shall receive an amount equal to the benefit they would receive pursuant to RCW 51.32.050 but for the remarriage. This subsection applies to surviving spouses and domestic partners whose benefits pursuant to RCW 51.32.050 were suspended or terminated due to remarriage prior to July 24, 2015. The monthly payments to any surviving spouse or domestic partner who received a lump sum payment pursuant to RCW 51.32.050 shall be actuarially reduced to reflect the amount of the lump sum payment.

[ 2016 c 115 s 1; 2015 c 78 s 1; 2010 c 261 s 1. Prior: 2009 c 523 s 7; 2009 c 226 s 2; 2006 c 345 s 1; 2004 c 5 s 1; 2000 c 247 s 1001; prior: 1995 c 245 s 1; 1995 c 144 s 19; 1993 c 236 s 3; 1991 c 365 s 31; 1990 c 249 s 14; 1977 ex.s. c 294 s 12.]

NOTES:

Application—2010 c 261 s 1: "Section 1 of this act applies prospectively to the benefits of all members killed in the course of employment since October 1, 1977." [ 2010 c 261 s 8.]

Contractual right not granted—2006 c 345: "The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this act in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual right to receive any distribution not granted prior to that time." [ 2006 c 345 s 3.]

Effective dates—Subchapter headings not law—2000 c 247: See RCW 41.40.931 and 41.40.932.

Effective date—1995 c 245: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [May 5, 1995]." [ 1995 c 245 s 3.]

Severability—1991 c 365: See note following RCW 41.50.500.

Findings—1990 c 249: See note following RCW 2.10.146.

Legislative direction and placement—Section headings—1977 ex.s. c 294: See notes following RCW 41.26.410.